th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การเจาะและการสัก > อุปกรณ์สัก: ที่คลุมรอยสัก; หมึกสัก; เครื่องสัก; เข็มสัก
da: Erhverv og industri > Piercing og tatovering > Tatoveringsudstyr: Tatoveringsdækken; Tatoveringsblæk; Tatoveringsmaskiner; Tatoveringsnåle
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Piercing ve Dövme > Dövme Sarf Malzemeleri: Dövme Kapatıcılar; Dövme Mürekkepleri; Dövme Makineleri; Dövme İğneleri
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Auskarų vėrimas ir tatuiruotės > Tatuiravimo reikmenys: Tatuiruočių dangalai; Tatuiravimo rašalas; Tatuiravimo mašinėlės; Tatuiravimo adatos
es: Economía e industria > Piercings y tatuajes > Instrumentos para tatuajes: Camuflajes de tatuajes; Tintas para tatuajes; Máquinas para tatuajes; Agujas para tatuajes
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Pirsing in tetoviranje > Pripomočki za tetoviranje: Pripomočki za prekrivanje tetovaž; Črnila za tetoviranje; Naprave za tetoviranje; Igle za tetoviranje
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Пирсинг и татуировка > Товары для татуировки: Накладки для татуировок; Краски для татуировки; Тату-машинки; Иглы для татуировки
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Piercing en tatoeages > Tatoeagebenodigdheden: Afdekking voor tatoeages; Tatoeage-inkt; Tatoeagemachines; Tatoeagenaalden
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Piercing és tetoválás > Tetoválási kellékek: Tetoválástakarók; Tetoválótinták; Tetoválógépek; Tetoválótűk
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Piercing e tatuagem > Suprimentos para tatuagens: Cobertura para tatuagens; Tintas para tatuagem; Aparelhos para tatuagem; Agulhas para tatuagem
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 피어싱/문신 > 문신 용품: 문신 가리개; 문신 잉크; 문신 기계; 문신 바늘
nb: Forretninger og industri > Piercing og tatovering > Tatoveringsutstyr: Dekking av tatoveringer; Tatoveringsblekk; Tatoveringsmaskiner; Tatoveringsnåler
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Пиърсинг и татуиране > Консумативи за татуировки: Покрития за татуировки; Мастила за татуиране; Машини за татуиране; Игли за татуиране
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Piercing & τατουάζ > Προμήθειες για τατουάζ: Κάλυψη τατουάζ; Μελάνια για τατουάζ; Μηχανήματα τατουάζ; Βελόνες τατουάζ
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Piercing i tatuaże > Sprzęt do tatuażu: Zakrycia tatuaży; Atramenty do tatuażu; Maszynki do tatuażu; Igły do tatuażu
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Piercing a tetování > Tetovací potřeby: Přípravky na zakrytí tetování; Tetovací inkousty; Tetovací strojky; Tetovací jehly
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Piercing i tetoviranje > Pribor za tetoviranje: Prekrivajuće tetovaže; Tinte za tetoviranje; Strojevi za tetoviranje; Igle za tetoviranje
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 人體穿孔和刺青 > 刺青器材: 刺青遮掩配件; 刺青墨水; 刺青機; 刺青用針
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lävistykset ja tatuointi > Tatuointitarvikkeet: Tatuointipeitteet; Tatuointimusteet; Tatuointikoneet; Tatuointineulat
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 穿刺与纹身 > 纹身用品: 遮挡纹身服饰; 纹身色料; 纹身机; 纹身针
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Piercing & Tätowieren > Tätowierbedarf: Tattoo-Abdeckungen; Tätowierfarben; Tätowiermaschinen; Tätowiernadeln
en: Business & Industrial > Piercing & Tattooing > Tattooing Supplies: Tattoo Cover-Ups; Tattooing Inks; Tattooing Machines; Tattooing Needles
ja: ビジネス・産業 > ピアス・タトゥー > タトゥー用品: タトゥー直し; タトゥーインク; タトゥーマシン; タトゥーニードル
it: Commercio e industria > Piercing e tatuaggi > Prodotti per tatuaggi: Coperture tatuaggi; Inchiostri per tatuaggi; Macchinette per tatuaggi; Aghi per tatuaggi
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Piercing a tetovanie > Tetovacie potreby: Tetovacie motívy; Tetovacie atramenty; Tetovacie strojčeky; Tetovacie ihly
sv: Företag och industri > Piercing och tatuering > Tatueringsutrustning: Tatueringsdöljning; Tatueringsbläck; Tatueringsmaskiner; Tatueringsnålar
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Piercing și tatuaje > Articole pentru tatuaje: Acoperiri tatuaje; Cerneluri pentru tatuaje; Mașini de tatuat; Ace pentru tatuaje
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Xuyên và xăm > Mực xăm: Xăm đè; Mực để xăm; Máy xăm; Kim xăm
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Tatouages et piercings > Matériel de tatouage: Accessoires pour couvrir les tatouages; Encres de tatouage; Machines à tatouer; Aiguilles de tatouage
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Piercing e tatuagens > Artigos para tatuagem: Coberturas de tatuagens; Tintas de tatuagem; Máquinas de tatuagem; Agulhas de tatuagem